California, session 20252026, AB662.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(1) The residents of the southern region of the County of San Diego face barriers to accessing postsecondary education due to the absence of a public university in the region.(2) A collaborative, intersegmental approach is essential to identify appropriate models for expanding access in a way that meets local workforce needs and ensures regional equity.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a planning task force to evaluate the feasibility of creating a mixed-use intersegmental educational facility in order to provide postsecondary educational courses, academic program, and student support services in the City of Chula Vista.SEC. 2. Section 66014.7 is added to the Education Code, to read:66014.7. (a) The South County Higher Education Planning Task Force is hereby established for purposes of evaluating the feasibility of establishing a mixed-use intersegmental educational facility in the City of Chula Vista.(b) (1) The task force shall be composed of the following members:(A) At least one representative from San Diego State University appointed by the Chancellor of the California State University.(B) At least one representative from Southwestern College appointed by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(C) At least one representative from the University of California, San Diego, appointed by the President of the University of California.(D) At least one representative from the City of Chula Vista.(E) At least one representative from the Sweetwater Union High School District.(F) At least one public member appointed by the City of Chula Vista.(G) At least one representative appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(H) At least one representative appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate.(2) All task force members shall be South County residents or individuals who work or have a vested interest in the area.(3) The chair of the task force shall be voted on by a majority of the members.(c) The task force established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall do at least all of the following:(1) Identify and recommend potential governance structures for the mixed-use intersegmental educational facility, including, but not limited to, consortia and other collaborative models.(2) Identify and analyze potential site locations and infrastructure requirements.(3) Identify and recommend potential funding mechanisms, resources, and partnerships for the mixed-use intersegmental educational facility.(4) Identify any statutory barriers to the recommendations developed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, and recommend any statutory changes necessary for establishing the mixed-use intersegmental educational facility.(5) Conduct public engagement activities for purposes of gathering regional input.(6) Convene its first meeting on or before July 1, 2026.(d) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the task force established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before July 1, 2027.(2) The report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(e) (1) For purposes of this section, the task force may request and receive, but not require, information from the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the State Department of Education, any community college district, any local educational agency, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, the office of the President of the University of California, or any organization representing independent institutions of higher education.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.(f) The task force established pursuant to this section shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(g) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique postsecondary education needs of the people of the City of Chula Vista.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.